Utah statutes.
48-2c-1411 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Conversion or merger of a low-profit limited liability company.

A low-profit limited liability company may engage in the following to the same extent as a limited liability company that is not a low-profit limited liability company may do so under this part:

(1)  convert to another subject entity;

(2)  convert from another subject entity; or

(3)  participate in a merger.

